Utah statutes.
63M-11-207.   Oversight -- Executive director salary -- Staff support -- Use of funds.

(1)  The Center on Aging shall:

(a)  pay the salary, and oversee the performance of, the executive director of the commission;

(b)  provide staff support for the executive director of the commission and the commission; and

(c)  provide office space, furnishings, and supplies to the commission, the executive director of the commission, and support staff.

(2)  The funds appropriated by the Legislature for the commission may only be used for the purposes described in this chapter.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

